Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-925
Petition to use negotiated rulemaking committee; procedure; exception.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person may petition an agency to request the use of a negotiated rulemaking committee in the development or revision of a rule. Each agency shall prescribe the form of the petition and the procedure for its submission, consideration, and disposition. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall (a) deny the petition in writing stating its reasons therefor or (b) initiate the negotiated rulemaking procedure.

(2) A person committed to or otherwise incarcerated in a Department of Correctional Services facility may not petition the Department of Correctional Services to request the use of a negotiated rulemaking committee.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 5.